Utah statutes.
31A-22-512.   Individual insurability.
(1)  An insurer may exclude or limit the coverage under a group life policy on
any person, including a group member's dependent, as to whom the evidence of
individual insurability is not satisfactory to the insurer.
(2)  The group life insurance policy shall contain a provision setting forth
the conditions, if any, under which the insurer reserves the right to require
a person eligible for insurance to furnish satisfactory evidence to the
insurer of the individual insurability as a condition to part or all of his
coverage.
